Massachusetts, session 194th, S2416.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
The secretary of transportation is hereby authorized and directed to develop, participate 
in the development of, negotiate and enter into compacts on behalf of the Commonwealth with 
the states of Connecticut, New York, and Vermont, or any appropriate agency or jurisdiction 
thereof, to implement the following purposes: 
(a) It shall be the purpose of this compact, through means of joint and cooperative action 
among the compacting states to: (i) establish permanent commuter rail service between the cities 
of New Haven and Brattleboro including stops in Greenfield, Holyoke, Northampton, and 
Springfield; (ii) establish permanent commuter rail service between the cities of Worcester and 
Albany including stops in Pittsfield, Chester, Springfield, and Palmer; (iii) explore the extension 
of the New Haven-Hartford-Springfield Rail Program along the Knowledge Corridor through 

of 2 11 Holyoke, Northampton, Greenfield, and Brattleboro; (iv) publicly promote permanent commuter 
rail services connecting Berkshire, Franklin, Hampden, and Hampshire Counties to Albany, 
Boston, Brattleboro, Hartford, and New Haven, and undertake efforts to ensure the success of 
permanent commuter rail service in Western Massachusetts. 
(b) It shall be the policy of the compacting states that the activities conducted by any 
interstate commissions created are the formation of public policies and therefore are public 
business. Furthermore, the compacting states shall cooperate and observe their individual and 
collective duties and responsibilities to ensure the success of any programs established. The 
provisions of this compact shall be reasonably and liberally construed to accomplish the 
purposes and policies of the compact.